District of Columbia statutes.
1-624.03

Responsibility.

The appropriate personnel authority shall be responsible for making a final determination that a reduction in force is necessary and for ensuring that the provisions of this subchapter and rules and regulations issued pursuant to this subchapter are applied when effecting a reduction-in-force within their respective agency.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2403, 25 DCR 5740
June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(x)(1), 45 DCR 2464
Applicability of § 101(x) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-624.01.
1973 Ed., § 1-354.3.
1981 Ed., § 1-625.3.